Maryland, session 2026, HB0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
15–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0716*

HOUSE BILL 716
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Land surveyor” means an individual who practices land surveying.
(n) “Property line surveyor” means an individual who practices property line
surveying.
15–610.
DURING DEER FIREARMS HUNTING SEASON UNDER § 10–410 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE, A LAND SURVEYOR OR A PROPERTY LINE
SURVEYOR MAY NOT CONDUCT A SURVEY ON PRIVATE PROPERTY WITHOUT THE
WRITTEN PERMISSION OF THE PROPERTY OWNER.
[15–610.] 15–611.
(a) A person who violates any provision of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment not exceeding 6
months or both.
(b) (1) The Board may impose on a person who violates any provision of this
title a penalty not exceeding $5,000 for each violation.
(2) In setting the amount of the penalty, the Board shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the harm caused by the violation;
(iii) the good faith of the violator;
(iv) any history of previous violations by the violator; and
(v) any other relevant factors.
(3) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.